basic-cs.aff
FLAG long
SFX Y1 Y 145
SFX Y1   ý           á          ý
SFX Y1   ý           é          ý
SFX Y1   ý           ého        ý
SFX Y1   ý           ému        ý
SFX Y1   ý           ém         ý
SFX Y1   0           m          ý
SFX Y1   ý           ou         ý
SFX Y1   á           é          á
SFX Y1   á           ou         á
SFX Y1   á           ých        á
SFX Y1   á           ým         á
SFX Y1   á           ými        á
SFX Y1   0           ho         é
SFX Y1   0           mu         é
SFX Y1   0           m          é
SFX Y1   é           ým         é
SFX Y1   é           á          é
SFX Y1   é           ých        é
SFX Y1   é           ými        é
SFX Y1   ý           í          [^rhk]ý
SFX Y1   rý          ří         rý
SFX Y1   hý          zí         [^c]hý
SFX Y1   chý         ší         chý
SFX Y1   ký          cí         [^scč]ký
SFX Y1   ský         ští        ský
SFX Y1   cký         čtí        cký
SFX Y1   ký          cí         čký
SFX Y1   0           ch         ý
SFX Y1   0           mi         ý
SFX Y1   0           ma         ý
SFX Y1   0           ho         í
SFX Y1   0           mu         í
SFX Y1   0           m          í
SFX Y1   0           ch         í
SFX Y1   0           mi         í
SFX Y1   0           ma         í
SFX Y1   oj          ého        [io]j
SFX Y1   oj          ému        [io]j
SFX Y1   oj          ý          [io]j
SFX Y1   oj          ém         [io]j
SFX Y1   oj          ým         [io]j
SFX Y1   skoj        ští        sk[io]j
SFX Y1   ckoj        čtí        ck[io]j
SFX Y1   koj         cí         [^sc]k[io]j
SFX Y1   oj          í          [^k][io]j
SFX Y1   oj          ých        [io]j
SFX Y1   oj          é          [io]j
SFX Y1   oj          ými        [io]j
SFX Y1   0           ho         [iy]
SFX Y1   0           mu         [iy]
SFX Y1   0           m          [iy]
SFX Y1   0           ové        [iy]
SFX Y1   0           ch         [iy]
SFX Y1   0           ů          [iy]
SFX Y1   0           ům         [iy]
SFX Y1   0           e          [iy]
SFX Y1   0           ích        [iy]
SFX Y1   0           mi         [iy]
SFX Y1   0           i          [iy]
SFX Y1   0           ho         e
SFX Y1   0           mu         e
SFX Y1   0           m          e
SFX Y1   e           ové        e
SFX Y1   e           ů          e
SFX Y1   e           ům         e
SFX Y1   e           y          e
SFX Y1   0           ch         e
SFX Y1   0           ho         ě
SFX Y1   0           mu         ě
SFX Y1   0           m          ě
SFX Y1   ně          ňové       ně
SFX Y1   ně          ňů         ně
SFX Y1   ně          ňům        ně
SFX Y1   ě           i          ě
SFX Y1   ě           ích        ě
SFX Y1   ův          ova        ův
SFX Y1   ův          ovu        ův
SFX Y1   ův          ově        ův
SFX Y1   ův          ovým       ův
SFX Y1   ův          ovi        ův
SFX Y1   ův          ovy        ův
SFX Y1   ův          ovo        ův
SFX Y1   ův          ovou       ův
SFX Y1   ův          ových      ův
SFX Y1   ův          ovými      ův
SFX Y1   ův          ovýma      ův
SFX Y1   0           a          in
SFX Y1   0           u          in
SFX Y1   0           ě          in
SFX Y1   0           ým         in
SFX Y1   0           i          in
SFX Y1   0           y          in
SFX Y1   0           ou         in
SFX Y1   0           ých        in
SFX Y1   0           ými        in
SFX Y1   0           o          in
SFX Y1   0           ýma        in
SFX Y1   en          oho        en
SFX Y1   en          omu        en
SFX Y1   en          om         en
SFX Y1   en          ím         en
SFX Y1   en          a          en
SFX Y1   en          é          en
SFX Y1   en          u          en
SFX Y1   en          ou         en
SFX Y1   en          o          en
SFX Y1   en          i          en
SFX Y1   en          y          en
SFX Y1   en          ěch        en
SFX Y1   en          ěm         en
SFX Y1   en          ěmi        en
SFX Y1   en          ěma        en
SFX Y1   do          oho        do
SFX Y1   do          omu        do
SFX Y1   do          om         do
SFX Y1   do          ým         do
SFX Y1   co          čeho       co
SFX Y1   co          čemu       co
SFX Y1   co          čem        co
SFX Y1   co          čím        co
SFX Y1   áš          ašeho      áš
SFX Y1   áš          ašemu      áš
SFX Y1   áš          ašem       áš
SFX Y1   áš          aším       áš
SFX Y1   áš          aše        áš
SFX Y1   áš          aší        áš
SFX Y1   áš          aši        áš
SFX Y1   áš          ašich      áš
SFX Y1   áš          ašim       áš
SFX Y1   áš          ašimi      áš
SFX Y1   áš          ašima      áš
SFX Y1   ůj          ého        ůj
SFX Y1   ůj          ému        ůj
SFX Y1   ůj          ém         ůj
SFX Y1   ůj          ým         ůj
SFX Y1   ůj          á          ůj
SFX Y1   ůj          oje        ůj
SFX Y1   ůj          é          ůj
SFX Y1   ůj          ojí        ůj
SFX Y1   ůj          ou         ůj
SFX Y1   ůj          oji        ůj
SFX Y1   ůj          í          ůj
SFX Y1   ůj          ých        ůj
SFX Y1   ůj          ými        ůj
SFX Y1   ůj          ýma        ůj

SFX R1 Y 25
SFX R1   ý           ě          [bpvmfdnt]ý  sticky
SFX R1   ý           e          [lsz]ý       sticky
SFX R1   hý          ze         [^c]hý       sticky
SFX R1   chý         še         chý          sticky
SFX R1   rý          ře         rý           sticky
SFX R1   ý           y          [sc]ký       sticky
SFX R1   ký          ce         [^sc]ký      sticky
SFX R1   í           ě          [dnt]í      sticky
SFX R1   í           e          [zž]í      sticky
SFX R1   í           eji        čí
SFX R1   ší          i          [eě]jší
SFX R1   0           ě          [bdfmnptvw]
SFX R1   g           ze         g
SFX R1   ch          še         ch
SFX R1   h           ze         [^c]h
SFX R1   k           ce         k
SFX R1   0           e          [cčjlřsšzž]
SFX R1   r           ře         r
SFX R1   o           ě          [bdfmnptvw]o
SFX R1   go          ze         go
SFX R1   cho         še         cho
SFX R1   ho          ze         [^c]ho
SFX R1   ko          ce         ko
SFX R1   o           e          [cčjlřsšzž]o
SFX R1   ro          ře         ro
