basic-cs.dic
agitační/Y1K1R1N1
agrární/Y1K1R1N1
alegorický/Y1C1R1N1Y2
alkoholický/Y1R1N1Y2
angolský/Y1R1N1
apatický/Y1C1R1N1Y2
arcibiskupský/Y1R1N1Y2
atmosférický/Y1R1
australský/Y1R1N1
babylonský/Y1K1R1
barokní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
bartošová/Y1
benátecký/Y1R1
bezelstný/Y1K1R1Y2
bezmotorový/Y1R1
bezvýznamný/Y1K1R1Y2
bipolární/Y1K1R1N1Y2
blažený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
bohulibý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
bojeschopný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
boží/Y1
brankářský/Y1R1N1
broumovský/Y1R1
budovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
básnický/Y1K1R1N1
béžový/Y1K1R1N1
cařihrad/H1R1
centimetrový/Y1R1
ceněný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
chlumecký/Y1R1
chomutovský/Y1R1
chtěný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
cirkusový/Y1R1
citový/Y1K1R1N1Y2
cykloturistický/Y1R1
databázový/Y1R1N1
defenzívní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
desetimetrový/Y1K1R1
deskový/Y1R1N1
dešťový/Y1R1N1
diskusní/Y1R1
diskutovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
dobromyslný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
dogmatický/Y1C1R1N1Y2
doktorský/Y1R1Y2
doporučující/Y1N1
doprovod/H1R1
dozrálý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
dramaturgický/Y1R1N1Y2
dryáčnický/Y1R1N1Y2
dušková/Y1
dvacetitisícový/Y1K1R1
dvouměsíční/Y1R1
dílčí/Y1
děložní/Y1R1
džínový/Y1R1N1
ekvivalentní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
emisní/Y1R1
etický/Y1C1R1N1Y2
evakuační/Y1
experimentální/Y1R1N1Y2
fatální/Y1K1R1N1Y2
federalistický/Y1C1R1
florentský/Y1R1
fotografovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
funkcionalistický/Y1C1R1Y2
geologický/Y1R1N1
germánský/Y1R1N1
habilitační/Y1R1N1
harmonický/Y1C1R1N1Y2
hektarový/Y1K1R1
hledající/Y1N1
hlubocký/Y1C1R1N1
hojivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
holicí/Y1
horský/Y1R1N1Y2
hovězí/Y1N1
hraničářský/Y1K1R1
humanitní/Y1R1N1Y2
humorný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
hřejivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
imaginární/Y1K1R1N1Y2
imunní/Y1R1N1
inovační/Y1K1R1N1
integrující/Y1N1
interpretační/Y1R1N1
jadrný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
jandová/Y1
jednobodový/Y1K1R1
jednoslovný/Y1K1R1N1
jehličnatý/Y1R1N1
jistý/Y1R1O1N1Y2
jiřský/Y1K1R1N1
kacířský/Y1R1N1
kamiónový/Y1K1R1N1
kapacitní/Y1R1N1
katedrální/Y1K1R1N1
kazetový/Y1R1N1
klanový/Y1K1R1
klusácký/Y1R1
klávesový/Y1R1N1
kolový/Y1R1N1
komfortní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
konický/Y1R1
konkurenceschopný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
korkový/Y1K1R1N1
koronární/Y1R1N1
koštovalová/Y1
krbový/Y1R1
krvavý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
kumulativní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
kunratický/Y1R1
kýžený/Y1R1N1Y2
křídový/Y1R1N1
ledovcový/Y1K1R1N1
lesnatý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
liberijský/Y1R1N1
listový/Y1R1N1
liščí/Y1
lámaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
látkový/Y1K1R1N1
malinský/Y1
manažerský/Y1K1R1N1
maskovací/Y1N1
melodramatický/Y1C1R1N1Y2
mesiášský/Y1R1N1
mimoúrovňový/Y1K1R1
mimoškolní/Y1R1
množný/Y1K1R1N1
modifikovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
motivační/Y1R1
mražený/Y1R1N1
mylný/Y1K1R1Y2
město/M1Q1R1
naběhlý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
nahraditelný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
nakloněný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
nastartovaný/Y1K1R1N1
nastavený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
nejapný/Y1K1R1Y2
nenadálý/Y1K1R1
nitranský/Y1K1R1N1
normální/Y1K1R1N1Y2
numerický/Y1R1N1
nájezdový/Y1R1N1
náročný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
několikametrový/Y1K1R1
obchodující/Y1N1
obměněný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
obratný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
ocelový/Y1K1R1N1
oceňovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
odloučený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
odmítnutý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
odvolatelný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
ohleduplný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
okultní/Y1K1R1N1
opadavý/Y1K1R1N1
opotřebovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
orientovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
oslavující/Y1N1
osázený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
otočený/Y1K1R1N1
ošetřující/Y1N1
pachový/Y1R1N1
paritní/Y1R1N1
pastorální/Y1R1
pejorativní/Y1K1R1Y2
petrohrad/H1R1
pilarová/Y1
pletený/Y1K1R1N1
plný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
podepsaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
podezíravý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
podvodný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
podélný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
pokorný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
policejní/Y1R1N1Y2
polární/Y1K1R1N1Y2
popsaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
porovnatelný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
posvátný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
posázavský/Y1
poválečný/Y1R1N1
pověrčivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
pošramocený/Y1R1N1
pradávný/Y1R1N1Y2
preferovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
probádaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
prognostický/Y1R1
proměnlivý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
propocený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
protihlukový/Y1K1R1
protiněmecký/Y1K1R1Y2
prožitý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
prsní/Y1R1N1
ptáčková/Y1
pumový/Y1K1R1N1
pětibodový/Y1R1
pětitisícový/Y1K1R1
předražený/Y1K1R1N1
předčasný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
přenášený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
přetržený/Y1K1R1N1
přibitý/Y1K1R1N1
přivolaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
přátelský/Y1K1R1N1Y2
příznačný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
pšeničný/Y1R1N1
razantní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
reaktivní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
reprezentativní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
respirační/Y1R1N1
rolečková/Y1
rovinový/Y1R1
rozhněvaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
rozlícený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
rozrušený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
rozzuřený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
ruzyňský/Y1R1
salónní/Y1R1N1
samonosný/Y1K1R1N1
sebelepší/Y1
sedmdesátiprocentní/Y1K1R1N1
sesazený/Y1K1R1N1
severovýchod/H1R1
sirotčí/Y1N1
sklepní/Y1R1N1
skvělý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
slovinský/Y1R1N1
slušovický/Y1R1
směnečný/Y1K1R1N1
snaživý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
sourozenecký/Y1C1R1N1
splývavý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
společný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
spínací/Y1N1
stamilionový/Y1R1
startující/Y1N1
stočený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
stravinský/Y1
stárnoucí/Y1N1
stávkový/Y1R1N1
sukulentní/Y1R1N1
svazácký/Y1R1N1
svědčící/Y1N1
syrský/Y1R1N1
tabákový/Y1R1N1Y2
temperamentní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
tereziin/Y1
tomášová/Y1
totožný/Y1K1R1N1
tripartitní/Y1R1
trpný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
tvarovaný/Y1K1R1N1
týnecký/Y1R1
třeskutý/Y1K1R1Y2
ucelený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
udávaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
umělohmotný/Y1K1R1
uměřený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
usekaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
usměvavý/Y1R1Y2
uvážlivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
ušlechtilý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
varhanní/Y1
velkoobjemový/Y1K1R1
versailleský/Y1
vlachová/Y1
vlastenecký/Y1R1N1Y2
vodovodní/Y1
vozový/Y1R1
vránová/Y1
vydřený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vyhnaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vynalézavý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vynesený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vysokozdvižný/Y1K1R1
vysušený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vyvezený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vyřazený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vzatý/Y1K1R1N1
vánoční/Y1R1N1Y2
vápencový/Y1R1N1
výkupné/Y1
výnosný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
věcný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
většinový/Y1K1R1N1Y2
wildová/Y1
zahraničněobchodní/Y1R1
zajišťovací/Y1N1
zanícený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zastupující/Y1N1
zatoulaný/Y1K1R1N1
zbořený/Y1K1R1N1
zběžný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zděšený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zhýčkaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zkoumaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zmatený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
znakový/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zplnomocněný/Y1K1R1N1
zpracovatelský/Y1R1
zuřivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zvací/Y1
zákulisní/Y1R1N1
zámečnický/Y1R1N1
zářijový/Y1K1R1N1
zřícený/Y1K1R1N1
ústavní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
územní/Y1R1N1
čenský/Y1
čilý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
čtrnáctidenní/Y1R1
řemeslný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
řečnický/Y1K1R1N1Y2
šeříkový/Y1R1
šilhavý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
štábní/Y1R1
železitý/Y1R1N1Y2
ženský/Y1K1R1N1Y2
ničí/Y1
